Hawaii statutes.
[§150A-22] Responsibility for treatment.
Any treatment of nursery stock which may be required under the provisions of
law shall be at the risk and at the expense of the owner or persons in charge
or in possession thereof at the time of treatment, unless otherwise provided.
[L 1977, c 114, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next